New Jersey, session 221, A1631.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The State Board of Examiners, upon receipt of a request by an applicant for an expedited review of his application for teaching staff member certification, shall either issue the certificate, or deny certification and notify the applicant of the reasons for the denial, within one week of the request, provided: a.     the completed application has been on file with the State Board of Examiners for at least four weeks prior to the date on which the applicants request is received by the board; and b.    the applicants request is received by the board within the two week period prior to Labor Day in that school year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.